epay/epayservices/src/main/resources/com/otextpdf/text/pdf/hyphenation/hyph/gl.xml
		.supe3rásedes.
		.supe3rasen.
		.supe3rade.
		.supe3rádeo.
		.supe3rádeos.
		.supe3rádea.
		.supe3rádeas.
		.supe3rador.
		.supe3radora.
		.supe3radores.
		.supe3radoras.
		.supe3ración.
		supe3r2ior
		supe3r2a3ble
		supe3r2a3bilidade
		a3er.
		a3endo.
		a3eres.
		a3ermos.
		a3erdes.
		a3eren.
		a3erme.
		a3erte.
		a3erlle.
		a3ernos.
		a3ervos.
		a3erlles.
		a3elo.
		a3elos.
		a3ela.
		a3elas.
		a3ede.
		a3édeo.
		a3édea.
		a3édeos.
		a3édeas.
		a3emos.
		a3edes.
		a3eron.
		a3ese.
		a3eses.
		a3esemos.
		a3ésemos.
		a3esedes.
		a3ésedes.
		a3esen.
	</patterns>

</hyphenation-info>
